Florida, session 2026, HB469.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (136) is added to section 320.08058,
Florida Statutes, to read:
320.08058 Specialty license plates.—
(136) MIAMI CAROL CITY SENIOR HIGH SCHOOL ALUMNI LICENSE
PLATES.—
(a) The department shall develop a Miami Carol City Senior
High School Alumni license plate as provided in this section and
s. 320.08053. The plate must bear the colors and design approved
by the department. The word "Florida" must appear at the top of
the plate, and the words "Miami Carol City Senior High School
Alumni" must appear at the bottom of the plate.
(b) The annual use fees from the sale of the plate must be
distributed to the Chief Hall Association, Inc., which may use
up to 10 percent of the fees for administrative costs and
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb469-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 469 2026
marketing of the plate. The balance of the fees must be used by
the Chief Hall Association, Inc., to fund academic programs,
athletic programs, extracurricular activities, and auxiliary
programs for, and programs designed to incentivize the
achievement of, students attending Miami Carol City Senior High
School.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb469-00